Missouri, session 2026, HB1804.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.304, 302.440, 302.525, and 302.574, RSMo, are repealed
and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 302.304, 302.440,
302.525, and 302.574, to read as follows:
302.304. 1. The director shall notify by ordinary mail any operator of the point value
charged against the operator's record when the record shows four or more points have been
accumulated in a twelve-month period.
2. In an action to suspend or revoke a license or driving privilege under this section
points shall be accumulated on the date of conviction. No case file of any conviction for a
driving violation for which points may be assessed pursuant to section 302.302 may be closed
until such time as a copy of the record of such conviction is forwarded to the department of
revenue.
3. The director shall suspend the license and driving privileges of any person whose
driving record shows the driver has accumulated eight points in eighteen months.
4. The license and driving privilege of any person whose license and driving privilege
have been suspended under the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 except those
persons whose license and driving privilege have been suspended under the provisions of
subdivision (8) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 or has accumulated sufficient points
together with a conviction under subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 and who
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1804 2
has filed proof of financial responsibility with the department of revenue, in accordance with
chapter 303, and is otherwise eligible, shall be reinstated as follows:
(1) In the case of an initial suspension, thirty days after the effective date of the
suspension;
(2) In the case of a second suspension, sixty days after the effective date of the
suspension;
(3) In the case of the third and subsequent suspensions, ninety days after the effective
date of the suspension.

Unless proof of financial responsibility is filed with the department of revenue, a suspension
shall continue in effect for two years from its effective date.
5. The period of suspension of the driver's license and driving privilege of any person
under the provisions of subdivision (8) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 or who has
accumulated sufficient points together with a conviction under subdivision (10) of subsection
1 of section 302.302 shall be thirty days, followed by a sixty-day period of restricted driving
privilege as defined in section 302.010. Upon completion of such period of restricted driving
privilege, upon compliance with other requirements of law and upon filing of proof of
financial responsibility with the department of revenue, in accordance with chapter 303, the
license and driving privilege shall be reinstated. If a person, otherwise subject to the
provisions of this subsection, files proof of installation with the department of revenue that
any vehicle operated by such person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device, there shall be no period of suspension. However, in lieu of a suspension the
person shall instead complete a ninety-day period of restricted driving privilege. If the person
fails to maintain such proof of the device with the director of revenue as required, the
restricted driving privilege shall be terminated. Upon completion of such ninety-day period
of restricted driving privilege, upon compliance with other requirements of law, and upon
filing of proof of financial responsibility with the department of revenue, in accordance with
chapter 303, the license and driving privilege shall be reinstated. However, if the monthly
monitoring reports during such ninety-day period indicate that the ignition interlock device
has registered a confirmed blood alcohol concentration level above the alcohol setpoint
established by the department of transportation or such reports indicate that the ignition
interlock device has been tampered with or circumvented, then the license and driving
privilege of such person shall not be reinstated until the person completes an additional thirty-
day period of restricted driving privilege.
6. If the person fails to maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance with
chapter 303, or, if applicable, if the person fails to maintain proof that any vehicle operated is

HB 1804 3
equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device installed pursuant to
subsection 5 of this section, the person's driving privilege and license shall be resuspended.
7. The director shall revoke the license and driving privilege of any person when the
person's driving record shows such person has accumulated twelve points in twelve months or
eighteen points in twenty-four months or twenty-four points in thirty-six months. The
revocation period of any person whose license and driving privilege have been revoked under
the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 and who has filed proof of financial
responsibility with the department of revenue in accordance with chapter 303 and is otherwise
eligible, shall be terminated by a notice from the director of revenue after one year from the
effective date of the revocation. Unless proof of financial responsibility is filed with the
department of revenue, except as provided in subsection 2 of section 302.541, the revocation
shall remain in effect for a period of two years from its effective date. If the person fails to
maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance with chapter 303, the person's license
and driving privilege shall be rerevoked. Any person whose license and driving privilege
have been revoked under the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 shall, upon receipt of
the notice of termination of the revocation from the director, pass the complete driver
examination and apply for a new license before again operating a motor vehicle upon the
highways of this state.
8. If, prior to conviction for an offense that would require suspension or revocation of
a person's license under the provisions of this section, the person's total points accumulated
are reduced, pursuant to the provisions of section 302.306, below the number of points
required for suspension or revocation pursuant to the provisions of this section, then the
person's license shall not be suspended or revoked until the necessary points are again
obtained and accumulated.
9. If any person shall neglect or refuse to surrender the person's license, as provided
herein, the director shall direct the state highway patrol or any peace or police officer to
secure possession thereof and return it to the director.
10. Upon the issuance of a reinstatement or termination notice after a suspension or
revocation of any person's license and driving privilege under the provisions of sections
302.010 to 302.540, the accumulated point value shall be reduced to four points, except that
the points of any person serving as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States
outside the limits of the United States during a period of suspension or revocation shall be
reduced to zero upon the date of the reinstatement or termination of notice. It shall be the
responsibility of such member of the Armed Forces to submit copies of official orders to the
director of revenue to substantiate such overseas service. Any other provision of sections
302.010 to 302.540 to the contrary notwithstanding, the effective date of the four points

HB 1804 4
remaining on the record upon reinstatement or termination shall be the date of the
reinstatement or termination notice.
11. No credit toward reduction of points shall be given during periods of suspension
or revocation or any period of driving under a limited driving privilege granted by a court or
the director of revenue.
12. Any person or nonresident whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended or revoked under this or any other law shall, before having
the license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle reinstated, pay to the director a
reinstatement fee of twenty dollars which shall be in addition to all other fees provided by
law.
13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if after two years from
the effective date of any suspension or revocation issued under this chapter, except any
100 suspension or revocation issued under section 302.410, 302.462, or 302.574, the person or
101 nonresident has not paid the reinstatement fee of twenty dollars, the director shall reinstate
102 such license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state. Any person who has had his
103 or her license suspended or revoked under section 302.410, 302.462, or 302.574, shall be
104 required to pay the reinstatement fee.
105 14. No person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle suspended or revoked
106 as a result of an assessment of points for a violation under subdivision (8), (9) or (10) of
107 subsection 1 of section 302.302 shall have that license reinstated until such person has
108 participated in and successfully completed a substance abuse traffic offender program defined
109 in section 302.010, or a program determined to be comparable by the department of mental
110 health. Assignment recommendations, based upon the needs assessment as described in
111 subdivision (24) of section 302.010, shall be delivered in writing to the person with written
112 notice that the person is entitled to have such assignment recommendations reviewed by the
113 court if the person objects to the recommendations. The person may file a motion in the
114 associate division of the circuit court of the county in which such assignment was given, on a
115 printed form provided by the state courts administrator, to have the court hear and determine
116 such motion pursuant to the provisions of chapter 517. The motion shall name the person or
117 entity making the needs assessment as the respondent and a copy of the motion shall be
118 served upon the respondent in any manner allowed by law. Upon hearing the motion, the
119 court may modify or waive any assignment recommendation that the court determines to be
120 unwarranted based upon a review of the needs assessment, the person's driving record, the
121 circumstances surrounding the offense, and the likelihood of the person committing a like
122 offense in the future, except that the court may modify but may not waive the assignment to
123 an education or rehabilitation program of a person determined to be a prior or persistent
124 offender as defined in section 577.001 or of a person determined to have operated a motor

HB 1804 5
125 vehicle with fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight in such person's blood.
126 Compliance with the court determination of the motion shall satisfy the provisions of this
127 section for the purpose of reinstating such person's license to operate a motor vehicle. The
128 respondent's personal appearance at any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection shall
129 not be necessary unless directed by the court.
130 15. The fees for the program authorized in subsection 14 of this section, or a portion
131 thereof to be determined by the department of mental health, shall be paid by the person
132 enrolled in the program. Any person who is enrolled in the program shall pay, in addition to
133 any fee charged for the program, a supplemental fee in an amount to be determined by the
134 department of mental health for the purposes of funding the substance abuse traffic offender
135 program defined in section 302.010 or a program determined to be comparable by the
136 department of mental health. The administrator of the program shall remit to the division of
137 alcohol and drug abuse of the department of mental health on or before the fifteenth day of
138 each month the supplemental fee for all persons enrolled in the program, less two percent for
139 administrative costs. Interest shall be charged on any unpaid balance of the supplemental fees
140 due the division of alcohol and drug abuse pursuant to this section and shall accrue at a rate
141 not to exceed the annual rate established pursuant to the provisions of section 32.065, plus
142 three percentage points. The supplemental fees and any interest received by the department
143 of mental health pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the mental health earnings fund
144 which is created in section 630.053.
145 16. Any administrator who fails to remit to the division of alcohol and drug abuse of
146 the department of mental health the supplemental fees and interest for all persons enrolled in
147 the program pursuant to this section shall be subject to a penalty equal to the amount of
148 interest accrued on the supplemental fees due the division pursuant to this section. If the
149 supplemental fees, interest, and penalties are not remitted to the division of alcohol and drug
150 abuse of the department of mental health within six months of the due date, the attorney
151 general of the state of Missouri shall initiate appropriate action of the collection of said fees
152 and interest accrued. The court shall assess attorney fees and court costs against any
153 delinquent program.
154 17. Any person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle suspended or
155 revoked as a result of:
156 (1) An assessment of points for a conviction for an intoxication-related traffic
157 offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was
158 found to be at least eight-hundredths of one percent but less than fifteen-hundredths of
159 one percent by weight of alcohol in such person's blood and who has a prior alcohol-
160 related enforcement contact as defined under section 302.525[,]; or

HB 1804 6
161 (2) An assessment of points for a conviction for an intoxication-related traffic
162 offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content
163 was found to be fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such
164 person's blood
165
166 shall be required to file proof with the director of revenue that any motor vehicle operated by
167 the person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device as a required
168 condition of reinstatement of the license. The ignition interlock device shall further be
169 required to be maintained on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period of not less
170 than six months immediately following the date of reinstatement. If the monthly monitoring
171 reports show that the ignition interlock device has registered any confirmed blood alcohol
172 concentration readings above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of
173 transportation or that the person has tampered with or circumvented the ignition interlock
174 device within the last three months of the six-month period of required installation of the
175 ignition interlock device, then the period for which the person must maintain the ignition
176 interlock device following the date of reinstatement shall be extended until the person has
177 completed three consecutive months with no violations as described in this section. If the
178 person fails to maintain such proof with the director, the license shall be resuspended or
179 revoked and the person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
302.440. In addition to any other provisions of law, a court may require that any
person who is found guilty of a first intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in section
577.001, and a court shall require that any person who is found guilty of a second or
subsequent intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in section 577.001, or any person
who is found guilty of an intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined under section
577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was found to be fifteen-hundredths
of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood shall not operate any
motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock
device that the person must use for a period of not less than six months from the date of
reinstatement of the person's driver's license. In addition, any court authorized to grant a
limited driving privilege under section 302.309 to any person who is found guilty of a second
or subsequent intoxication-related traffic offense or to any person who is found guilty of an
intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the
person's blood alcohol content was found to be fifteen-hundredths of one percent or
more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood shall require the use of an ignition
interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person as a required condition of the limited
driving privilege, except as provided in section 302.441. These requirements shall be in
addition to any other provisions of this chapter or chapter 577 requiring installation and

HB 1804 7
maintenance of an ignition interlock device. Any person required to use an ignition interlock
device shall comply with such requirement subject to the penalties provided by section
577.599.
302.525. 1. The license suspension or revocation shall become effective fifteen days
after the subject person has received the notice of suspension or revocation as provided in
section 302.520, or is deemed to have received the notice of suspension or revocation by mail
as provided in section 302.515. If a request for a hearing is received by or postmarked to the
department within that fifteen-day period, the effective date of the suspension or revocation
shall be stayed until a final order is issued following the hearing; provided, that any delay in
the hearing which is caused or requested by the subject person or counsel representing that
person without good cause shown shall not result in a stay of the suspension or revocation
during the period of delay.
2. The period of license suspension or revocation under this section shall be as
follows:
(1) If the person's driving record shows no prior alcohol-related enforcement contacts
during the immediately preceding five years, the period of suspension shall be thirty days
after the effective date of suspension, followed by a sixty-day period of restricted driving
privilege as defined in section 302.010 and issued by the director of revenue. The restricted
driving privilege shall not be issued until he or she has filed proof of financial responsibility
with the department of revenue, in accordance with chapter 303, and is otherwise eligible.
The restricted driving privilege shall indicate [whether] that a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device is required as a condition of operating a motor vehicle. A copy of the
restricted driving privilege shall be given to the person and such person shall carry a copy of
the restricted driving privilege while operating a motor vehicle. In no case shall restricted
driving privileges be issued pursuant to this section or section 302.535 until the person has
completed the first thirty days of a suspension under this section. If a person otherwise
subject to the provisions of this subdivision files proof of installation with the department of
revenue that any vehicle that he or she operates is equipped with a functioning, certified
ignition interlock device, there shall be no period of suspension. However, in lieu of a
suspension the person shall instead complete a ninety-day period of restricted driving
privilege. Upon completion of such ninety-day period of restricted driving privilege,
compliance with other requirements of law, and filing of proof of financial responsibility with
the department of revenue, in accordance with chapter 303, the license and driving privilege
shall be reinstated. However, if the monthly monitoring reports during such ninety-day
period indicate that the ignition interlock device has registered a confirmed blood alcohol
concentration level above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of transportation
or such reports indicate that the ignition interlock device has been tampered with or

HB 1804 8
circumvented, then the license and driving privilege of such person shall not be reinstated
until the person completes an additional thirty-day period of restricted driving privilege. If
the person fails to maintain such proof of the device with the director of revenue as required,
the restricted driving privilege shall be terminated;
(2) The period of revocation shall be one year if the person's driving record shows
one or more prior alcohol-related enforcement contacts during the immediately preceding five
years;
(3) In no case shall restricted driving privileges be issued under this section to any
person whose driving record shows one or more prior alcohol-related enforcement contacts or
to any person whose driving record shows a conviction of an intoxication-related traffic
offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content
was found to be fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such
person's blooduntil the person has filed proof with the department of revenue that any motor
vehicle operated by the person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock
device as a required condition of the restricted driving privilege. If the person fails to
maintain such proof the restricted driving privilege shall be terminated.
3. For purposes of this section, "alcohol-related enforcement contacts" shall include
any suspension or revocation under sections 302.500 to 302.540, any suspension or
revocation entered in this or any other state for a refusal to submit to chemical testing under
an implied consent law, and any conviction in this or any other state for a violation which
involves driving while intoxicated, driving while under the influence of drugs or alcohol, or
driving a vehicle while having an unlawful alcohol concentration.
4. Where a license is suspended or revoked under this section and the person is also
convicted on charges arising out of the same occurrence for a violation of section 577.010 or
577.012 or for a violation of any county or municipal ordinance prohibiting driving while
intoxicated or alcohol-related traffic offense, both the suspension or revocation under this
section and any other suspension or revocation arising from such convictions shall be
imposed, but the period of suspension or revocation under sections 302.500 to 302.540 shall
be credited against any other suspension or revocation arising from such convictions, and the
total period of suspension or revocation shall not exceed the longer of the two suspension or
revocation periods.
5. Any person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle revoked under this
section or suspended under this section with one or more prior alcohol-related enforcement
contacts or a conviction for an intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined under
section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was found to be fifteen-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood showing
on their driver record shall be required to file proof with the director of revenue that any

HB 1804 9
motor vehicle operated by that person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device as a required condition of reinstatement. The ignition interlock device shall
further be required to be maintained on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period
of not less than six months immediately following the date of reinstatement. If the monthly
monitoring reports show that the ignition interlock device has registered any confirmed blood
alcohol concentration readings above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of
transportation or that the person has tampered with or circumvented the ignition interlock
device within the last three months of the six-month period of required installation of the
ignition interlock device, then the period for which the person must maintain the ignition
interlock device following the date of reinstatement shall be extended until the person has
completed three consecutive months with no violations as described in this section. If the
person fails to maintain such proof with the director, the license shall be suspended or
revoked, until proof as required by this section is filed with the director, and the person shall
be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
302.574. 1. If a person who was operating a vehicle refuses upon the request of the
officer to submit to any chemical test under section 577.041, the officer shall, on behalf of the
director of revenue, serve the notice of license revocation personally upon the person and
shall take possession of any license to operate a vehicle issued by this state which is held by
that person. The officer shall issue a temporary permit, on behalf of the director of revenue,
which is valid for fifteen days and shall also give the person notice of his or her right to file a
petition for review to contest the license revocation.
2. Such officer shall make a certified report under penalties of perjury for making a
false statement to a public official. The report shall be forwarded to the director of revenue
and shall include the following:
(1) That the officer has:
(a) Reasonable grounds to believe that the arrested person was driving a motor
vehicle while in an intoxicated condition; or
(b) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was driving a motor vehicle with a blood alcohol content of two-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight; or
(c) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was committing a violation of the traffic laws of the state, or political
subdivision of the state, and such officer has reasonable grounds to believe, after making such
stop, that the person had a blood alcohol content of two-hundredths of one percent or greater;
(2) That the person refused to submit to a chemical test;
(3) Whether the officer secured the license to operate a motor vehicle of the person;
(4) Whether the officer issued a fifteen-day temporary permit;

HB 1804 10
(5) Copies of the notice of revocation, the fifteen-day temporary permit, and the
notice of the right to file a petition for review. The notices and permit may be combined in
one document; and
(6) Any license, which the officer has taken into possession, to operate a motor
vehicle.
3. Upon receipt of the officer's report, the director shall revoke the license of the
person refusing to take the test for a period of one year; or if the person is a nonresident, such
person's operating permit or privilege shall be revoked for one year; or if the person is a
resident without a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle in this state, an order shall be
issued denying the person the issuance of a license or permit for a period of one year.
4. If a person's license has been revoked because of the person's refusal to submit to a
chemical test, such person may petition for a hearing before a circuit division or associate
division of the court in the county in which the arrest or stop occurred. Pursuant to local court
rule promulgated pursuant to Section 15 of Article V of the Missouri Constitution, the case
may also be assigned to a traffic judge pursuant to section 479.500. The person may request
such court to issue an order staying the revocation until such time as the petition for review
can be heard. If the court, in its discretion, grants such stay, it shall enter the order upon a
form prescribed by the director of revenue and shall send a copy of such order to the director.
Such order shall serve as proof of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state and the
director shall maintain possession of the person's license to operate a motor vehicle until
termination of any revocation under this section. Upon the person's request, the clerk of the
court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county and the prosecutor shall appear at the
hearing on behalf of the director of revenue. At the hearing, the court shall determine only:
(1) Whether the person was arrested or stopped;
(2) Whether the officer had:
(a) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person was driving a motor vehicle while
in an intoxicated or drugged condition; or
(b) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was driving a motor vehicle with a blood alcohol content of two-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight; or
(c) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was committing a violation of the traffic laws of the state, or political
subdivision of the state, and such officer had reasonable grounds to believe, after making such
stop, that the person had a blood alcohol content of two-hundredths of one percent or greater;
and
(3) Whether the person refused to submit to the test.

HB 1804 11
5. If the court determines any issue not to be in the affirmative, the court shall order
the director to reinstate the license or permit to drive.
6. Requests for review as provided in this section shall go to the head of the docket of
the court wherein filed.
7. No person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle suspended or revoked
under the provisions of this section shall have that license reinstated until such person has
participated in and successfully completed a substance abuse traffic offender program defined
in section 302.010, or a program determined to be comparable by the department of mental
health. Assignment recommendations, based upon the needs assessment as described in
subdivision (24) of section 302.010, shall be delivered in writing to the person with written
notice that the person is entitled to have such assignment recommendations reviewed by the
court if the person objects to the recommendations. The person may file a motion in the
associate division of the circuit court of the county in which such assignment was given, on a
printed form provided by the state courts administrator, to have the court hear and determine
such motion under the provisions of chapter 517. The motion shall name the person or entity
making the needs assessment as the respondent and a copy of the motion shall be served upon
the respondent in any manner allowed by law. Upon hearing the motion, the court may
modify or waive any assignment recommendation that the court determines to be unwarranted
based upon a review of the needs assessment, the person's driving record, the circumstances
surrounding the offense, and the likelihood of the person committing a similar offense in the
future, except that the court may modify but shall not waive the assignment to an education or
rehabilitation program of a person determined to be a prior or persistent offender as defined in
section 577.001, or of a person determined to have operated a motor vehicle with a blood
alcohol content of fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight. Compliance with the
court determination of the motion shall satisfy the provisions of this section for the purpose of
reinstating such person's license to operate a motor vehicle. The respondent's personal
appearance at any hearing conducted under this subsection shall not be necessary unless
directed by the court.
8. The fees for the substance abuse traffic offender program, or a portion thereof, to
be determined by the division of behavioral health of the department of mental health, shall
be paid by the person enrolled in the program. Any person who is enrolled in the program
shall pay, in addition to any fee charged for the program, a supplemental fee to be determined
by the department of mental health for the purposes of funding the substance abuse traffic
offender program defined in section 302.010. The administrator of the program shall remit to
the division of behavioral health of the department of mental health on or before the fifteenth
day of each month the supplemental fee for all persons enrolled in the program, less two
percent for administrative costs. Interest shall be charged on any unpaid balance of the

HB 1804 12
supplemental fees due to the division of behavioral health under this section, and shall accrue
at a rate not to exceed the annual rates established under the provisions of section 32.065, plus
three percentage points. The supplemental fees and any interest received by the department
100 of mental health under this section shall be deposited in the mental health earnings fund,
101 which is created in section 630.053.
102 9. Any administrator who fails to remit to the division of behavioral health of the
103 department of mental health the supplemental fees and interest for all persons enrolled in the
104 program under this section shall be subject to a penalty equal to the amount of interest
105 accrued on the supplemental fees due to the division under this section. If the supplemental
106 fees, interest, and penalties are not remitted to the division of behavioral health of the
107 department of mental health within six months of the due date, the attorney general of the
108 state of Missouri shall initiate appropriate action for the collection of said fees and accrued
109 interest. The court shall assess attorneys' fees and court costs against any delinquent program.
110 10. Any person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle revoked under this
111 section and who has a prior alcohol-related enforcement contact, as defined in section
112 302.525, or who has been convicted of an intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined
113 under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was found to be
114 fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood
115 shall be required to file proof with the director of revenue that any motor vehicle operated by
116 the person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device as a required
117 condition of license reinstatement. Such ignition interlock device shall further be required to
118 be maintained on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period of not less than six
119 months immediately following the date of reinstatement. If the monthly monitoring reports
120 show that the ignition interlock device has registered any confirmed blood alcohol
121 concentration readings above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of
122 transportation or that the person has tampered with or circumvented the ignition interlock
123 device within the last three months of the six-month period of required installation of the
124 ignition interlock device, then the period for which the person shall maintain the ignition
125 interlock device following the date of reinstatement shall be extended until the person has
126 completed three consecutive months with no violations as described in this section. If the
127 person fails to maintain such proof with the director as required by this section, the license
128 shall be rerevoked until proof as required by this section is filed with the director, and the
129 person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
130 11. The revocation period of any person whose license and driving privilege has been
131 revoked under this section and who has filed proof of financial responsibility with the
132 department of revenue in accordance with chapter 303 and is otherwise eligible shall be
133 terminated by a notice from the director of revenue after one year from the effective date of

HB 1804 13
134 the revocation. Unless proof of financial responsibility is filed with the department of
135 revenue, the revocation shall remain in effect for a period of two years from its effective date.
136 If the person fails to maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance with chapter 303,
137 the person's license and driving privilege shall be rerevoked.
138 12. A person commits the offense of failure to maintain proof with the Missouri
139 department of revenue if, when required to do so, he or she fails to file proof with the director
140 of revenue that any vehicle operated by the person is equipped with a functioning, certified
141 ignition interlock device or fails to file proof of financial responsibility with the department of
142 revenue in accordance with chapter 303. The offense of failure to maintain proof with the
143 Missouri department of revenue is a class A misdemeanor.
✔